Florida, session 2026, HB1035.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
19
20 Section 1. Paragraphs (b) and (e) of subsection (3) of
21 section 258.397, Florida Statutes, are amended to read:
22 258.397 Biscayne Bay Aquatic Preserve.—
23 (3) AUTHORITY OF TRUSTEES.—The Board of Trustees of the
24 Internal Improvement Trust Fund is authorized and directed to
25 maintain the aquatic preserve hereby created pursuant and
Page 1 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1035-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1035 2026
26 subject to the following provisions:
27 (b) No further dredging or filling of submerged lands of
28 the preserve shall be approved or tolerated by the board of
29 trustees except:
30 1. Such minimum dredging and spoiling as may be authorized
31 for public navigation projects or for such minimum dredging and
32 spoiling as may be constituted as a public necessity or for
33 preservation of the bay according to the expressed intent of
34 this section.
35 2. Such other alteration of physical conditions, including
36 the placement of riprap, as may be necessary to enhance the
37 quality and utility of the preserve.
38 3. Such minimum dredging and filling as may be authorized
39 for the creation and maintenance of marinas, piers, and docks
40 and their attendant navigation channels and access roads. Such
41 projects may only be authorized upon a specific finding by the
42 board of trustees that there is assurance that the project will
43 be constructed and operated in a manner that will not adversely
44 affect the water quality and utility of the preserve. This
45 subparagraph shall not authorize the connection of upland canals
46 to the waters of the preserve.
47 4. Such dredging as is necessary for the purpose of
48 eliminating conditions hazardous to the public health or for the
49 purpose of eliminating stagnant waters, islands, and spoil
50 banks, the dredging of which would enhance the aesthetic and
Page 2 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1035-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1035 2026
51 environmental quality and utility of the preserve and be clearly
52 in the public interest as determined by the board of trustees.
53 5. Such minimum dredging and filling as may be authorized
54 for the restoration and enhancement of natural systems,
55 including the management of substrate for vegetation planting
56 and restoration for mangroves, salt marshes, seagrasses, and
57 oyster reefs, to enhance the quality and utility of the preserve
58 and coastal resiliency.
59
60 Any dredging or filling under this subsection or improvements
61 under subsection (5) shall be approved only after public notice
62 as provided by s. 253.115.
63 (e) Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the
64 board of trustees may, respecting lands lying within Biscayne
65 Bay:
66 1. Enter into agreements for and establish lines
67 delineating sovereignty and privately owned lands.
68 2. Enter into agreements for the exchange of, and
69 exchange, sovereignty lands for privately owned lands.
70 3. Accept gifts of land within or contiguous to the
71 preserve.
72 4. Negotiate for, and enter into agreements with owners of
73 lands contiguous to sovereignty lands for, any public and
74 private use of any of such lands.
75 5. Take any and all actions convenient for, or necessary
Page 3 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1035-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1035 2026
76 to, the accomplishment of any and all of the acts and matters
77 authorized by this paragraph.
78 6. Conduct restoration and enhancement efforts in Biscayne
79 Bay and its tributaries.
80 7. Stabilize eroding shorelines of Biscayne Bay and its
81 tributaries that are contributing to turbidity by planting
82 natural vegetation to the greatest extent feasible and by the
83 placement of riprap and living shorelines and seawalls, as
84 determined by Miami-Dade County in conjunction with the
85 Department of Environmental Protection.
86 8. Request the South Florida Water Management District to
87 enter into a memorandum of understanding with the Department of
88 Environmental Protection, the Biscayne National Park Service,
89 the Miami-Dade County Department of Environmental Resources
90 Management and, at their option, the Corps of Engineers to
91 include enhanced marine productivity in Biscayne Bay as an
92 objective when operating the Central and Southern Florida Flood
93 Control projects consistently with the goals of the water
94 management district, including flood protection, water supply,
95 and environmental protection.
96 Section 2. Paragraph (e) of subsection (3) of section
97 258.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
98 258.42 Maintenance of preserves.—The Board of Trustees of
99 the Internal Improvement Trust Fund shall maintain such aquatic
100 preserves subject to the following provisions:
Page 4 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1035-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1035 2026
101 (3)
102 (e) Structures may not be erected within the preserve,
103 except:
104 1. Private residential docks may be approved for
105 reasonable ingress or egress of riparian owners. Slips at
106 private residential single-family docks which contain boat lifts
107 or davits that do not float in the water when loaded may not, in
108 whole or in part, be enclosed by walls, but may be roofed if the
109 roof does not overhang more than 1 foot beyond the footprint of
110 the lift and the boat stored at the lift. Such roofs are not
111 included in the square-footage calculation of a terminal
112 platform.
113 2. Private residential multislip docks may be approved if
114 located within a reasonable distance of a publicly maintained
115 navigation channel, or a natural channel of adequate depth and
116 width to allow operation of the watercraft for which the docking
117 facility is designed without the craft having an adverse impact
118 on marine resources. The distance shall be determined in
119 accordance with criteria established by the trustees by rule,
120 based on the depth of the water, nature and condition of bottom,
121 and presence of manatees.
122 3. Commercial docking facilities shown to be consistent
123 with the use or management criteria of the preserve may be
124 approved if the facilities are located within a reasonable
125 distance of a publicly maintained navigation channel, or a
Page 5 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1035-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1035 2026
126 natural channel of adequate depth and width to allow operation
127 of the watercraft for which the docking facility is designed
128 without the craft having an adverse impact on marine resources.
129 The distance shall be determined in accordance with criteria
130 established by the trustees by rule, based on the depth of the
131 water, nature and condition of bottom, and presence of manatees.
132 4. Structures for shore protection, including restoration
133 of seawalls at their previous location or upland of or within 18
134 inches waterward of their previous location, approved
135 navigational aids, or public utility crossings authorized under
136 paragraph (a) may be approved.
137 5. Nature-based solutions to improve coastal resiliency,
138 including living seawalls, shoreline and vegetation planting,
139 seagrass planting, wave attenuation devices, and green or hybrid
140 green-gray stormwater infrastructure, that are sited to provide
141 the most appropriate benefit.
142
143 A structure under this paragraph or chapter 253 may not be
144 prohibited solely because the local government fails to adopt a
145 marina plan or other policies dealing with the siting of such
146 structures in its local comprehensive plan.
147 Section 3. Section 380.0938, Florida Statutes, is created
148 to read:
149 380.0938 Nature-based methods for improving coastal
150 resilience.—
Page 6 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1035-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1035 2026
151 (1) By January 1, 2027, the department shall develop
152 design guidelines and standards for optimal combinations of
153 nature-based methods for using green or hybrid green-gray
154 infrastructure to address coastal resiliency, including local
155 mitigation strategies for erosion control, sea level rise, and
156 storm surge.
157 (2) By January 1, 2027, the department must initiate
158 rulemaking to provide for a clear and consistent statewide
159 permitting process under s. 373.4131 for nature-based methods
160 for improving coastal resilience and to address all of the
161 following:
162 (a) Criteria and thresholds for permits to implement
163 nature-based methods, including monitoring, inspection, and
164 reporting requirements.
165 (b) Procedures governing the review of applications and
166 notices, duration and modification of permits, operational
167 requirements, and transfers of permits.
168 (c) Provisions for emergencies, abandonment and removal of
169 systems, and significant erosion in areas of critical state
170 concern.
171 (d) Exemptions and general permits that do not allow
172 significant adverse impacts to occur individually or
173 cumulatively.
174 (e) Improvement of coastal resilience using nature-based
175 solutions, including living seawalls, shoreline and vegetation
Page 7 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1035-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1035 2026
176 planting, seagrass planting, wave attenuation devices, green or
177 hybrid green-gray stormwater infrastructure, beach
178 renourishment, dune and wetland restoration, reinforced dunes,
179 reef restoration, and ecologically sound building materials.
180 (f) Protection and maintenance of access to and navigation
181 of the marked channel and the right-of-way of the Florida
182 Intracoastal Waterway as defined in s. 327.02.
183 (g) Creation of permitting incentives for the use of new
184 strategies and technologies, such as 3D printing and other forms
185 of manufacturing, for living shorelines and nature-based
186 features for coastal protection.
187 (h) Incentives to encourage local governmental entities to
188 create projects using nature-based solutions for coastal
189 protection through the Resilient Florida Grant Program pursuant
190 to s. 380.093(3)(b)1.d.
191 (i) Guidelines for determining when a nature-based
192 solutions project is clearly in the public interest and safety
193 under s. 373.414(1)(a).
194 (j) Development of a clear and efficient permitting
195 process after designated storm events or disasters to replace
196 failed coastal infrastructure with nature-based or hybrid green-
197 gray infrastructure that follows established guidelines in s.
198 380.0938(1).
199 (k) Identification of ways local governmental entities can
200 participate in coastal resiliency, including:
Page 8 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1035-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1035 2026
201 1. Mangrove replanting and hydrological restoration
202 programs.
203 2. Restoration of oyster reefs, salt marshes, seagrass
204 beds, and coral reefs.
205 3. Identification and monitoring of threats to mangroves.
206 4. Protection of barrier and spoil islands.
207 (3) The department and local governments shall promote
208 public awareness and education of the value of nature-based
209 solutions for coastal resiliency, including the preservation and
210 restoration of wetlands, floodplains, seagrasses, mangroves, and
211 other natural systems along the coastline.
212 Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 9 of 9
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1035-00